lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_finalE-noHop.txt
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteni PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteni PostInflVIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegteni       PostInflVIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
! %{%.fL%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!----------------------------------------------|
!            ALLATIVE (terminalis)             |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mun              PostInflVIII; ^[All.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}nun             PostInflVIII; ^[All.Du]:^gnun                    PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mnun            PostInflVIII; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mnun            PostInflVIII; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemnun          PostInflVIII;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnnun           PostInflVIII; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnnun           PostInflVIII; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnnun         PostInflVIII;
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegnun         PostInflVIII; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegnun         PostInflVIII; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegnun       PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpenun          PostInflVIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpenun          PostInflVIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpenun          PostInflVIII;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegnun         PostInflVIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegnun         PostInflVIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegnun         PostInflVIII;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesinun        PostInflVIII; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesinun        PostInflVIII; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesinun        PostInflVIII;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegnun       PostInflVIII; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegnun       PostInflVIII; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegnun       PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nganun  PostInflVIII; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}nganun  PostInflVIII; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenun          PostInflVIII;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVIII; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVIII; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVIII;
^[All.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkenun          PostInflVIII; ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVIII; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}minun    PostInflVIII; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}minun    PostInflVIII; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^gminun          PostInflVIII;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggnun  PostInflVIII; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggnun  PostInflVIII; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggnun        PostInflVIII;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megnun   PostInflVIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megnun   PostInflVIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegnun         PostInflVIII;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtenun PostInflVIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtenun PostInflVIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegtenun       PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
! %{.fL.%} [Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!-------------------------------------------------|
!               PERLATIVE (vialis)                |
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}kun                PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.Pl]:^tgun                       PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.Du]:^gnekun                   PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mkun               PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mkun               PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemkun           PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mteggun            PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mteggun            PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemteggun        PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegnegun          PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegnegun          PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegnegun      PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegun             PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegun             PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegun           PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesigun           PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesigun           PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesigun         PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegnegun        PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegnegun        PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegnegun      PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}%ngakun    PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}%ngakun    PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenkun          PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun   PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun   PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkenkun            PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}%ngakun    PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mikun       PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mikun       PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmikun           PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteggun   PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteggun   PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmegteggun       PostInflVIII;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtegnegun PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtegnegun PostInflVIII; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegtegnegun     PostInflVIII;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
! %{.fS.%} [from fieldwork with Speaker 14, 2018-07-22]

!----------------------------------------------|
!              EQUATIVE (equalis)              |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^%{.f.%}tun              PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.Pl]:^stun                    PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.Du]:^gestun                 PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mtun            PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mtun            PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemtun         PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mtestun         PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mtestun         PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemtestun      PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegestun       PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegestun       PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegestun    PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpetun          PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpetun          PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpetun         PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesistun       PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesistun       PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesistun      PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegetun      PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegetun      PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegetun     PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngatun  PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngatun  PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^gketun         PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gketun          PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mitun    PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mitun    PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmitun         PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVIII;  ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmegestun     PostInflVIII;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflVIII; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegestun      PostInflVIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                   |
!   ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                 |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.f.%}m              VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^%{.fL.%}n             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^gn                    VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemn          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnn         VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegn       VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpen          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpen          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpen          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegn         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegn         VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesin        VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesin        VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesin        VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegn       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegn       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegn       VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^gken          VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gken          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitn VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}min    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}min    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmin          VerbRootEte;
